California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
“Producer-supplier” means any producer who engages in the operation of selling, marketing, or distributing pistachios that he or she has produced, or has purchased or acquired from a processor. It does not, however, include a retailer, except a retailer who purchases or acquires from, or sells, markets, or distributes on behalf of any producer, pistachios that were not previously subject to regulation by the commission. When the producer-supplier is a corporation, all of the directors and officers of the corporation in their capacity as individuals shall be included, and any liability for failure to submit records pursuant to a requirement to which a corporate producer-supplier may be subject pursuant to this chapter shall include identical liability upon each individual director and officer of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 726, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

69030.

When the secretary is required to concur in a decision of the commission, the secretary shall indicate his or her response to the commission within 15 working days from notification of that decision. The response may be a request that additional information be provided.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 69029 by Stats. 1997, Ch. 726, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. The California Pistachio Commission [69031. - 69045.]

69031.

There is in the state government the California Pistachio Commission. The commission shall be composed of eight pistachio producers and one public member. Producers within the respective districts shall elect four producers from District 1, three producers from District 2, and one producer from District 3. 

The public member shall be appointed to the commission by the secretary from the nominees recommended by the commission.

The secretary and other appropriate individuals as determined by the commission shall be nonvoting ex officio members of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

69032.

The secretary may require the commission to correct or cease any existing activity or function that is determined by the secretary not to be in the public interest or to be in violation of this chapter.

If the commission refuses or fails to cease those activities or functions or to make corrections required by the secretary, the secretary may, upon written notice, suspend all or a portion of the activities or functions of the commission until the cessation or correction of activities or functions as required by the secretary has been accomplished by the commission.

Actions of the commission in violation of the written notice are without legal force or effect. The secretary, to the extent feasible, shall issue written notice prior to the commission entering into any contractual relationship affecting the existing or proposed activities or functions that are the subject of the written notice.

Upon service of the written notice, the secretary shall notify the commission in writing of the specific acts that the secretary determines are not in the public interest or are in violation of this chapter, the secretary’s reasons for requiring a cessation or correction of specific existing or proposed activities or functions, and the secretary may make recommendations that will make those activities or functions acceptable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

69033.

The commission or the secretary may bring an action for judicial relief from the secretary’s written notice, or from noncompliance by the commission with the written notice, in a court of competent jurisdiction, which may issue a temporary restraining order, permanent injunction, or other applicable relief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

69033.5.

The commission shall reimburse the secretary for all expenditures incurred by the secretary in carrying out his or her duties and responsibilities under this chapter. However, the court may, if it finds that the secretary acted arbitrarily or capriciously in restricting the activities or functions of the commission, relieve the commission of the responsibility for payment of the secretary’s legal costs with regard to the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

69034.

Each member of the commission, except the ex officio members, shall have an alternate member to be elected in the same manner as the member. An alternate member shall, in the absence of the member for whom he is alternate, serve in place of the member on the commission, and shall have and be able to exercise all the rights, privileges, and powers of the member when serving on the commission. In the event of death, removal, resignation, or the disqualification of a member, the alternate shall act as a member on the commission until a successor is elected and has qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 602.)
-------------------------------------------

69035.

Any vacancy on the commission occurring by the failure of any person elected to the commission as a member or alternate member to continue in his or her position due to a change in status making the member ineligible to serve, or due to death, removal, or resignation, shall be filled, for the unexpired portion of the term, by a majority vote of the commission. However, that person shall fulfill all the qualifications set forth in this article as required for the member whose office that person is to fill. The qualifications of any person to fill a vacancy on the commission shall be certified in writing to the secretary. The secretary shall notify the commission if the secretary determines that any such person is not qualified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

69036.

A producer member or his alternate on the commission shall be an individual, partner, or employee of a producer who has a financial interest in producing, or causing to be produced, pistachios for market. Not more than two such members shall be persons employed by, or connected in a proprietary capacity with, the same corporation, firm, partnership, association, or business organization and not more than one such member in any one district shall be so employed or connected. Qualification as a producer member must continue during the entire term of office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 602.)
-------------------------------------------

69037.

The public member or his alternate on the commission, shall have all the powers, rights, and privileges of any other member on the commission. The public member shall not have any financial interest in the pistachio industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 602.)
-------------------------------------------

69038.

The term of office of all commissioners, except any ex officio member, shall be two years from the date of their election and until their successors are qualified; provided, however, that of the first members of the commission, one-half of the producers shall serve for one year, and one-half of the producers shall serve for two years, with the determination of term of each such member to be made by lot at the time of election. Terms of office of each commissioner shall be limited to four consecutive terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 602.)
-------------------------------------------

69039.

The commission shall be and is hereby declared and created a corporate body. It shall have the power to sue and be sued, to contract and be contracted with, and to have and possess all of the powers of a corporation. It may adopt a corporate seal. Copies of its proceedings, records, and acts, when authenticated, shall be admissible in evidence in all courts of the state, and shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all statements therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 602.)
-------------------------------------------

69040.

A quorum of the commission shall be any five voting commissioners. Except as provided in Sections 69019 and 69102, the vote of a majority of members present at a meeting at which there is quorum shall constitute the act of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 602.)
-------------------------------------------

69041.

The secretary or the secretary’s representatives shall be notified and may attend each meeting of the commission, and any committee meeting of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

69042.

No commissioner or member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission shall receive a salary. Each commissioner, except ex officio government members, and each member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission may receive a sum of not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day, as established by the commission, for each day spent in actual attendance at, or in traveling to and from, meetings of the commission or committees of the commission, or on special assignment for the commission, as approved by the commission, together with the necessary traveling expenses and meal allowances, as approved by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 602.)
-------------------------------------------

69043.

All moneys received by any person from the assessments levied under the authority of this chapter or otherwise received by the commission, shall be deposited in such banks as the commission may designate and shall be disbursed by order of the commission through such agent or agents as it may designate for that purpose. Any such agent or agents shall be bonded by a fidelity bond, executed by a surety company authorized to transact business as such in the State of California, in favor of the commission, in the amount of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 602.)
-------------------------------------------

69044.

The state is not liable for the acts of the commission or its contracts. Payments of all claims arising by reason of the administration of this chapter or acts of the commission shall be limited to the funds collected by the commission. No member of the commission or alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof, is personally liable on the contracts of the commission and no commissioner, alternate member, or employee of the commission is responsible individually in any way to any producer, processor, producer-supplier, or any other person for error in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent, or employee, except for his or her own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No commissioner or alternate member shall be held responsible individually for any act or omission of any member of the commission. The liability of the commissioners is several and not joint, and no commissioner is liable for the default of any other commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 726, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

69045.

All proprietary information obtained by the commission or the secretary from producers, processors, or producer-suppliers shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed except when required by a court order after a hearing in a judicial proceeding involving this chapter. Information on volume shipments, crop value, and any other related information that is required for reports to governmental agencies, financial reports to the commission or aggregate sales and inventory information, and any other information that the processors or producer-suppliers request from the commission to receive in total, excluding individual processor or producer-supplier information, may be disclosed by the commission.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 69084 by Stats. 1997, Ch. 726, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties of the Commission [69051. - 69051.]

69051.

The powers and duties of the commission, subject to Sections 69032 and 69033, include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) To adopt and, from time to time, alter, rescind, modify, and amend all proper and necessary bylaws, rules, regulations, and orders for carrying out this chapter, including rules for appeals from any bylaw, rule, regulation, or order of the commission. The adoption, alteration, rescission, modification, or amendment of any bylaw, rule, regulation, or order implementing the brand-credit advertising program authorized pursuant to subdivision (i) is subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) To administer and enforce this chapter, and to do and perform all acts and exercise all powers incidental to, or in connection with, or determined reasonably necessary for, the proper or advisable effectuation of the purposes of this chapter.

(c) To appoint its own officers, including a chairperson, one or more vice chairpersons, and any other officers as it determines necessary. The officers have the powers and duties delegated to them by the commission.

(d) To employ a manager to serve at the pleasure of the commission as president and chief executive officer of the commission, and other personnel, including legal counsel, that are necessary to carry out this chapter. The commission may retain a management firm or the staff from any board, commission, or committee of the state to perform the functions prescribed by this subdivision under the control of the commission. If the manager engages in any conduct that the secretary determines is not in the public interest or that is in violation of this chapter, the secretary shall notify the commission of the conduct and request that corrective and, if appropriate, disciplinary action be taken by the commission. If the commission fails or refuses to correct the situation or to take disciplinary action satisfactory to the secretary, the secretary may suspend or discharge the manager.

(e) To fix the compensation for all employees of the commission.

(f) To appoint committees composed of both members and nonmembers of the commission, such as a processor advisory committee, to advise the commission in carrying out this chapter.

(g) To establish offices and incur expenses, invest funds in the permissible investments as specified in Section 58939, enter into any and all contracts and agreements, and create liabilities and borrow funds in advance of receipt of assessments as may be necessary, in the opinion of the commission, for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter and the performance of its duties.

(h) To keep accurate books, records, and accounts of all of its dealings, which books, records, and accounts shall be subject to an annual audit by an auditing firm selected by the commission with the concurrence of the secretary. The audit shall be made a part of an annual report to all producers of pistachios, copies of which shall also be submitted to the Legislature and the department. In addition, the secretary may, as the secretary determines necessary, conduct or cause to be conducted a fiscal and compliance audit of the commission. The Department of Finance may audit books, records, and accounts of the commission at any time.

(i) To promote the sale of pistachios by advertising and other promotional means, including cost-sharing advertising of pistachios or other complementary products and brand-credit advertising, for the purpose of maintaining and expanding present markets and creating new and larger intrastate, interstate, and foreign markets for pistachios, and to educate and instruct the public with respect to the uses, healthful properties, and nutritional value of pistachios. Any decision to implement a brand-credit advertising program shall be ratified by a vote of producers conducted pursuant to Section 69062.

(j) To require processors and producer-suppliers to provide records and other information necessary for the commission to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including, but not limited to, records and information regarding inventories, shipment destinations, and related information. Such records and information shall be preserved by the processor or producer-supplier for a period of two years and shall be offered and submitted for inspection at any reasonable time upon written demand of the commission or its duly authorized agent.

(k) To educate and instruct the wholesale and retail trade with respect to proper methods of handling and selling pistachios, make market surveys and analyses, and present facts to, and negotiate with, state, federal, and foreign agencies on matters that affect the marketing of pistachios.

(l) To make, in the name of the commission, contracts to render service in formulating and conducting plans and programs, and any other contracts or agreements as the commission may determine necessary for the promotion of the sale of pistachios.

(m) To conduct and contract with others to conduct scientific research, including the study, analysis, dissemination, and accumulation of information obtained from the research or elsewhere, respecting cultural and production practices, and marketing and distribution of pistachios. In connection with the research, the commission may accept contributions of, or match, private, state, or federal funds that may be available for these purposes, and employ or make contributions of funds to other persons or state or federal agencies conducting the research.

(n) To publish and distribute, without charge, a bulletin or other communication for dissemination of information relating to the pistachio industry to producers, processors, and producer-suppliers.

(o) To establish an assessment rate to defray operating costs of the commission. Any assessment rate established pursuant to this chapter may be modified in accordance with Section 69081.

(p) To establish an annual budget according to accepted accounting practices. The budget shall be concurred in by the secretary prior to disbursement of funds, except for disbursements made pursuant to subdivision (e).

(q) To submit to the secretary, for his or her concurrence, an annual statement of contemplated activities authorized under this chapter, including advertising, promotion, marketing research, and production research.

(r) To administer any governmental program establishing quality standards for the pistachio industry upon request of an authorized agent of a governmental agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 726, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Implementation and Voting Procedures [69061. - 69070.]

69061.

Within 90 days after January 1, 1981, the secretary shall establish a list of producers eligible to vote on implementation of this chapter. In establishing the list, the secretary shall require that processors, county agricultural commissioners, and pistachio producers submit the names, mailing addresses, and district numbers of all pistachio producers who produce merchantable pistachios. The request for the information shall be in writing. The list shall be filed within 30 days following receipt of the written notice.

Any producer of pistachios, whose name does not appear upon the secretary’s list of producers affected, may have his or her name established on the list by filing with the secretary a signed statement, identifying himself or herself as a producer. Failure to be on the list does not exempt the producer from paying assessments under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

69062.

This chapter, except as necessary to conduct an implementation referendum vote, shall not become operative until the secretary finds in a referendum conducted by the secretary that at least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the secretary pursuant to Section 69061, participate, and either of the following:

(a) Sixty-five percent or more of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the producers so voting marketed a majority of the total quantity of pistachios in the preceding season, or in the current season if the harvest and delivery of pistachios to processors is complete, as determined by the commission, by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(b) A majority of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the producers so voting marketed 65 percent or more of the total quantity of pistachios in the preceding season, or in the current season if the harvest and delivery of pistachios to processors is complete, as determined by the commission, by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

69063.

The secretary shall establish a period in which to conduct the referendum that shall not be less than 10 days or more than 60 days in duration, and may prescribe additional procedures necessary to conduct the referendum. If the initial period established is less than 60 days, the secretary may extend the period. However, the total referendum period may not exceed 60 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

69064.

Nonreceipt of a ballot shall not invalidate a referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 602.)
-------------------------------------------

69065.

If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has been given as provided in Section 69062, the secretary shall certify and give notice of the favorable vote to all producers whose names and addresses may be on file with the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

69066.

If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given as provided in Section 69062, the secretary shall so certify and declare this chapter inoperative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

69067.

Upon certification of the commission, the secretary shall call meetings of producers in each district for the purpose of nominating and electing persons for appointment to the commission by the secretary. All producers on the secretary’s list shall be given written notice of the election meetings at least 15 days prior to the meeting date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

69068.

To be eligible for election to the commission, producer nominees shall present to the secretary a nomination petition with the signatures of at least six eligible persons, as specified in Section 69068.5, from the district from which the nominee is seeking election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

69068.5.

To be eligible to sign a nomination petition pursuant to Section 69068, a person shall meet either of the following qualifications:

(a) Be a producer as provided in Section 69027.

(b) Be engaged within this state in the business of growing nonproducing pistachio trees for the purpose of becoming a producer as defined in Section 69027 and who is not otherwise exempt from this chapter pursuant to Section 69082.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 391, Sec. 4.   Effective July 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

69069.

Subsequent to the first election of commissioners under this chapter, persons to be elected to the commission shall be selected pursuant to nomination and election procedures that shall be established by the commission with the concurrence of the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

69070.

Prior to the referendum vote conducted by the secretary pursuant to Section 69062, the proponents of the commission shall deposit with the secretary the amount that the secretary may deem necessary to defray the expenses of preparing the necessary lists and information and conducting the vote.

Any funds not used in carrying out Section 69062 shall be returned to the proponents of the commission who deposited the funds with the secretary.

Upon establishment of the commission, the commission may reimburse the proponents of the commission for any funds deposited with the secretary that were used in carrying out Section 69062, and for any legal expenses and costs incurred in establishing the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Assessments and Records [69081. - 69088.]

69081.

The commission, not later than October 1 of each year, shall establish the assessment for the marketing season that begins September 1 and continues through August 31 of the following year, which shall not exceed 5 percent of the average price received by producers, computed on a per pound basis or computed in any other manner determined by the commission to be reasonably equivalent to the per pound computation. The commission may revise the assessment established prior to October 1 of each year if it determines, based on information including crop volume, that the action is necessary, and if the revision does not exceed the assessment limitations specified in this section and the modification is made prior to the date established by the commission for payment of the assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 726, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

69082.

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to pistachios produced only for the producer’s home use or where the pistachios are used only for ornamental purposes; provided, however, that such producer shall file an affidavit with the commission establishing that his pistachios are not produced for commercial purposes. In any event, no production of pistachios in excess of 1,000 dried pounds per year is exempt from the assessment under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 602.)
-------------------------------------------

69083.

Every processor shall keep a complete and accurate record of all pistachios processed by him with the name of the producer whose pistachios were processed. Such records shall be in simple form and contain such information as the commission shall prescribe. Such records shall be preserved by the processor for a period of two years and shall be offered and submitted for inspection at any reasonable time upon written demand of the commission or its duly authorized agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 602.)
-------------------------------------------

69085.

Assessments shall be upon the producer. The first handler of pistachios being assessed shall deduct the assessment from amounts paid by him or her to the producer, or shall collect the assessment from the producer, and shall be a trustee of the funds until they are paid to the commission at the time and in the manner prescribed by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 726, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

69086.

Every processor shall be personally liable for the payment of the collected assessments, and failure of the processor to collect the assessment from any producer shall not exempt any processor from such liability.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 602.)
-------------------------------------------

69087.

Any assessment which is levied as provided for in this chapter, is a personal debt of every producer so assessed. Failure of a processor to make payment of the collected assessment to the commission shall not relieve the producer of this obligation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 602.)
-------------------------------------------

69088.

(a) Any producer or processor who fails to file a return or pay any assessment within the time required by the commission shall pay to the commission a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the assessment determined to be past due and, in addition, interest on the unpaid balance at the rate of 112 percent per month.

(b) In addition to any other penalty imposed, the commission may require any person who fails to pay any assessment or related charge pursuant to this article to furnish and maintain a surety bond in a form and amount and for a period of time specified by the commission as assurance that all payments to the commission will be made when due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 14.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Actions and Penalties [69091. - 69093.]

69091.

It is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or by both such fine and imprisonment, for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Willfully to render or furnish a false report, statement, or record required by the commission.

(b) When engaged in the processing or marketing of pistachios or in the wholesale or retail trade of pistachios, to fail or refuse to furnish to the commission or its duly authorized agents, upon request, information concerning the name and address of the persons from whom he or she has received pistachios and the quantity so received, or any other report, statement, or record required by the commission.

(c) Secrete, destroy, or alter records required to be kept under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 726, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

69092.

The commission shall adopt procedures for the purpose of according individuals aggrieved by its actions or determinations an informal hearing before the commission, or before a committee of the commission designated for that purpose. Appeals from decisions of the commission may be made to the secretary. The determination of the secretary shall be subject to judicial review upon petition filed with the appropriate superior court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

69093.

The commission may commence civil actions and utilize all remedies provided in law or equity for the collection of assessments and civil penalties, and for the obtaining of injunctive relief or specific performance, respecting this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted under this chapter. A court shall issue to the commission any requested writ of attachment or injunctive relief upon a prima facie showing by verified complaint that a named defendant has violated this chapter or any other rule or regulation of the commission, including, but not limited to, the nonpayment of assessments. No bond shall be required to be posted by the commission as a condition for the issuance of any writ of attachment or injunctive relief. A writ of attachment shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 485.010) of Title 6.5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing specified by Section 485.010 is not required. Injunctive relief shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing of irreparable harm or of inadequate remedy at law specified by Section 526 or 527 is not required.

Upon entry of any final judgment on behalf of the commission against any defendant, the court shall enjoin the defendant from conducting any type of business regarding the commodity subject to this chapter until there is full compliance with and satisfaction of the judgment. Notwithstanding Section 69033.5, upon a favorable judgment for the commission, it may receive reimbursement for any reasonable attorney’s fees and other actual related costs. Venue for these actions may be established at the domicile or place of business of the defendant or in the county of the principal office of the commission. The commission may be sued only in the county of its principal office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 868, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Continuation or Suspension and Termination [69101. - 69105.]

69101.

Between September 1, 1985, and August 31, 1986, the commission shall cause a referendum to be conducted among producers in the manner prescribed in Section 69062 to determine whether the operations of this chapter shall be reapproved and continued in effect. If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has been given, the secretary shall so certify and this chapter shall remain effective. If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given, the secretary shall so certify and declare the operation of this chapter and the commission suspended upon the expiration of the marketing season ending August 31, 1986. Thereupon, the operations of the commission shall be concluded and funds distributed in the manner provided in Section 69104. No bond or security shall be required for any such referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

69102.

Following a favorable referendum conducted prior to August 31, 1986, a referendum shall be conducted by the commission every fifth year thereafter between October 1st and January 31st, following procedures provided by this section, unless a referendum is conducted as the result of a petition pursuant to Section 69103. In such case the referendum shall be every fifth year following the industry petitioned referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 602.)
-------------------------------------------

69103.

Upon a finding by a two-thirds vote of the commission that the operation of this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes, the commission may recommend to the secretary that the operation of this chapter be suspended. However, any suspension shall not become effective until the expiration of the current marketing season. The secretary shall, upon receipt of that recommendation, or may, after a public hearing to review a petition filed with the secretary requesting suspension, signed by 15 percent of the producers by number who produced not less than 15 percent of the volume in the immediately preceding season, cause a referendum to be conducted among the listed producers to determine if the operation and the operations of the commission shall be suspended. The secretary shall establish a referendum period, that shall not be less than 10 days or more than 60 days in duration. The secretary may prescribe additional procedures necessary to conduct a referendum. At the close of the established referendum period, the secretary shall tabulate the ballots filed during the referendum period. If at least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the secretary participate in the referendum, the secretary shall continue the operation of this chapter, if the secretary finds either one of the following:

(a) Sixty-five percent or more of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of continuation of this chapter, and the producers so voting marketed a majority or more of the total quantity of pistachios marketed in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(b) A majority of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of continuation of this chapter, and that the producers so voting marketed 65 percent or more of the total quantity of pistachios marketed in the preceding season by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

69104.

After the effective date of suspension of the operation of the provisions of this chapter and of the commission, the operations of the commission shall be concluded and any and all moneys remaining held by the commission, collected by assessment and not required to defray the expenses of concluding and terminating operations of the commission, shall be returned upon a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected in the immediately preceding current marketing season; provided further, however, that if the commission finds that the amounts so returnable are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of such pro rata refund to such persons, any such moneys remaining and any moneys remaining after payment of all expenses of winding up and terminating operations shall be withdrawn from the approved depository and paid into the State Treasury as unclaimed trust moneys.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 602.)
-------------------------------------------

69105.

Upon suspension of the operation of this chapter and of the commission, the commission shall mail a copy of the notice of suspension to all producers affected by the suspension whose names and addresses are on file.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 602.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Marketing Order Involvement [69111. - 69114.]

69111.

The commission may recommend to the secretary that he or she adopt pistachio quality standards, product labeling, or engage in any other activity authorized pursuant to the California Marketing Act of 1937 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 58601) of Part 2 of Division 21). The adoption of standards or any of these activities shall be in accordance with the procedures specified in that act unless otherwise specified in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

69112.

Any activity recommended by the commission shall not become operative until approved in the manner specified in Section 69062.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 772, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

69113.

Any activity adopted pursuant to this article shall be implemented by the secretary at the beginning of the marketing season next succeeding the date on which the activity is approved by the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

69114.

The commission shall serve as the advisory body to the secretary on all matters pertaining to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Cling Peaches [70000. - 70001.]

70000.
